Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.110

Criminal/civil penalties.

The commission of any act prohibited by RCW 19.225.100 by an athlete agent is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition to any criminal penalties, the court may assess a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for a violation of RCW 19.225.100.

[ 2002 c 131 s 12.]